Hawaii statutes.
[§10H-6] Dissolution of the Native Hawaiian
roll commission. The governor shall dissolve the Native Hawaiian roll
commission upon being informed by the Native Hawaiian roll commission that it
has published notice of any updated roll of qualified Native Hawaiians, as
provided in section 10H-4, and thereby completed its work. [L 2011, c 195, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next